es: Terreno: Puro; Montaña; Rodante; Otros
ja: 地形: フラット; マウンテン; ローリング; その他
en: Terrain: Flat; Mountain; Rolling; Other
th: ภูมิประเทศ: ราบ; ภูเขา; คดเคี้ยว; อื่นๆ
sv: Terräng: Platt; Fjäll; Rullande; Övrigt
el: Έδαφος: Επίπεδη; Βουνού; Κυλιομένο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Reljefas: Plokščias; Kalnai; Kalvos; Kita
bg-BG: Терен: Плосък; Планина; Хълмист; Други
pt-BR: Terreno: Plana; Montanha; Inclinado; Outro
pl: Teren: Płaski; Górski; Kroczący; Inne
ru: Местность: Плоский; Горный; Прокатывание; Другой
hu: Terep: Lapos; Hegyi; Hengerelés; Egyéb
ko: 지형: 플랫; 산악; 구르기; 기타
nl: Terrein: Vlak; Berg; Rollend; Andere
hr-HR: Teren: Ravni; Planinski; Brežuljkasti; Ostalo
sl-SI: Teren: Ravnina; Gorski; Hribovit; Drugo
pt-PT: Terreno: Plano; Montanha; Rolante; Outro
de: Terrain: Flach; Berg; Rollen; Sonstiges
fi: Maasto: Tasainen; Vuoristoinen; Mäkinen; Muu
cs: Terén: Plochý; Horský; Kopcovitý; Jiné
it: Terreno: Piatta; Montagna; Scosceso; Altro
da: Terræn: Flad; Bjerg; Rullende; Andet
zh-CN: 地形: 扁平的; 山地; 微丘区; 其他
sk-SK: Terén: Rovný; Hora; Rolovanie; Iné
fr: Terrain: Plate; Montagne; Vallonné; Autre
zh-TW: 地形: 平坦; 山; 平緩起伏; 其他
ro-RO: Teren: Plată; Munte; În pantă; Altele
vi: Địa hình: Phẳng; Núi; Nhấp nhô; Khác
tr: Arazi: Düz; Dağ; İnişli yokuşlu; Diğer
nb: Terreng: Flat; Fjell; Rullende; Annet